Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-241
Authority; coordinate activities with state.

In exercising any powers granted in the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, the authority shall coordinate its activities with the policy, program, and planning efforts of the state, particularly the Governor's Policy Research Office and the Department of Economic Development.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 41.